zh-CN: 客户支持渠道: 社区论坛; 电子邮件支持; 论坛支持; 应用内支持; 知识库和常见问题解答; 在线聊天支持; 个人代理人; 电话支持; 社交媒体支持; 培训课程; 视频教程; 网络研讨会; 其他
nl: Kanalen voor klantenondersteuning: Gemeenschapsforum; E-mailondersteuning; Forumondersteuning; Ondersteuning in de app; Kennisbank en veelgestelde vragen; Livechat-ondersteuning; Persoonlijk agent; Telefonische ondersteuning; Ondersteuning via sociale media; Trainingslessen; Video-uitleg; Webinars; Andere
sv: Kundsupportkanaler: Community-forum; E-postsupport; Forumsupport; Support i appen; Kunskapsbas och vanliga frågor; Live chat-support; Personlig agent; Telefonsupport; Support på sociala medier; Träningsklasser; Video tutorials; Webbseminarier; Övrigt
ko: 고객 지원 채널: 커뮤니티 포럼; 이메일 지원; 포럼 지원; 앱 내 지원; 기술 자료/FAQ; 실시간 채팅 지원; 개인 상담원; 전화 지원; 소셜 미디어 지원; 교육 수업; 비디오 튜토리얼; 웨비나; 기타
pt-BR: Canais de atendimento ao cliente: Fórum da Comunidade; Atendimento por e-mail; Atendimento do fórum; Atendimento no aplicativo; Base de conhecimento e perguntas frequentes; Atendimento por chat ao vivo; Agente pessoal; Atendimento por telefone; Atendimento de redes sociais; Aulas de treinamento; Tutoriais em vídeo; Webinars; Outro
hr-HR: Kanali korisničke podrške: Forum zajednice; Podrška e-poštom; Forumska podrška; Podrška unutar aplikacije; Baza znanja i često postavljana pitanja; Podrška za chat uživo; Osobni agent; Telefonska podrška; Podrška za društvene mreže; Tečajevi obuke; Videovodiči; Webinari; Ostalo
en: Customer support channels: Community forum; Email support; Forum support; In-app support; Knowledge base & FAQs; Live chat support; Personal agent; Phone support; Social media support; Training classes; Video tutorials; Webinars; Other
sk-SK: Kanály zákazníckej podpory: Komunitné fórum; E-mailová podpora; Podpora fóra; Podpora v aplikácii; Znalostná databáza a často kladené otázky; Podpora živého chatu; Osobný agent; Telefonická podpora; Podpora sociálnych médií; Školenia; Video návody; Webináre; Iné
fr: Canaux de service à la clientèle: Forum de la communauté; Assistance par e-mail; Assistance des forums; Assistance dans l'application; Base de connaissances et FAQ; Assistance par chat en direct; Agent personnel; Assistance téléphonique; Assistance réseaux sociaux; Cours de formation; Tutoriels vidéos; Webinaires; Autre
ru: Способы поддержки клиентов: Форум сообщества; Поддержка по электронной почте; Поддержка на форуме; Поддержка в приложении; База знаний и часто задаваемые вопросы; Поддержка в чате; Личный агент; Поддержка по телефону; Поддержка в социальных сетях; Учебные курсы; Видеоуроки; Вебинары; Другое
es: Canales de atención al cliente: Foro comunitario; Soporte por correo electrónico; Soporte de foro; Soporte en la aplicación; Base de conocimientos y preguntas frecuentes (FAQ); Soporte de chat en vivo; Agente personal; Soporte telefónico; Soporte en redes sociales; Clases de entrenamiento; Video tutoriales; Seminarios web; Otros
zh-TW: 顧客支援管道: 社群論壇; 電子郵件支援; 論壇支援; 應用程式內支援; 知識庫和常見問題解答; 即時訊息支援; 個人代理人; 電話支援; 社群媒體支援; 培訓班; 影片教學; 網路研討會; 其他
nb: Kundestøttekanaler: Fellesskapsforum; E-poststøtte; Forumstøtte; Støtte i appen; Kunnskapsbase og vanlige spørsmål; Direktechat-støtte; Personlig agent; Telefonstøtte; Støtte for sosiale medier; Treningstimer; Videoopplæringer; Webinarer; Annet
el: Κανάλια υποστήριξης πελατών: Φόρουμ κοινότητας; Υποστήριξη μέσω email; Υποστήριξη μέσω φόρουμ; Υποστήριξη εντός εφαρμογής; Γνωσιακή βάση και συχνές ερωτήσεις; Υποστήριξη μέσω ζωντανής συνομιλίας; Προσωπικός εκπρόσωπος; Υποστήριξη μέσω τηλεφώνου; Υποστήριξη μέσω μέσων κοινωνικής δικτύωσης; Μαθήματα κατάρτισης; Εκπαιδευτικά βίντεο; Διαδικτυακά σεμινάρια; Άλλο
tr: Müşteri Destek Kanalları: Topluluk forumu; E-posta desteği; Forum desteği; Uygulama içi destek; Bilgi tabanı ve SSS; Canlı sohbet desteği; Kişisel temsilci; Telefon desteği; Sosyal medya desteği; Eğitim sınıfları; Videolu eğitimleri; Web seminerleri; Diğer
th: ช่องทางการช่วยเหลือลูกค้า: ฟอรั่มชุมชน; ความช่วยเหลือทางอีเมล; ความช่วยเหลือผ่านกระดานสนทนา; ความช่วยเหลือในแอป; ฐานความรู้และคำถามที่พบบ่อย; ความช่วยเหลือผ่านไลฟ์แชท; ตัวแทนส่วนตัว; ความช่วยเหลือทางโทรศัพท์; ความช่วยเหลือทางโซเชียลมีเดีย; คลาสฝึกอบรม; วิดีโอบทแนะนำการใช้งาน; การสัมมนาผ่านเว็บ; อื่นๆ
hu: Ügyfélszolgálati csatornák: Közösségi fórum; E-mailes támogatás; Fórumos támogatás; Alkalmazáson belüli támogatás; Tudásbázis és GYIK; Élő csevegésen keresztüli támogatás; Személyes ügynök; Telefonos támogatás; Közösségi médián keresztüli támogatás; Képzések; Videós oktatóanyagok; Webináriumok; Egyéb
cs: Kanály zákaznické podpory: Komunitní fórum; E-mailová podpora; Podpora na fóru; Podpora v aplikaci; Znalostní báze a nejčastější dotazy; Podpora na živém chatu; Osobní agent; Podpora po telefonu; Podpora na sociálních sítích; Školení; Video tutoriály; Webináře; Jiné
pl: Kanały obsługi klienta: Forum społecznościowe; Wsparcie e-mailowe; Wsparcie na forum; Wsparcie w aplikacji; Baza wiedzy i często zadawane pytania; Wsparcie przez czat na żywo; Przedstawiciel indywidualny; Wsparcie telefoniczne; Wsparcie przez media społecznościowe; Zajęcia szkoleniowe; Samouczki wideo; Webinaria; Inne
bg-BG: Канали за поддръжка на клиенти: Форум на общността; Поддръжка по имейл; Поддръжка на форума; Поддръжка в приложението; База знания и често задавани въпроси; Поддръжка в чат в реално време; Личен агент; Телефонна поддръжка; Подкрепа за социалните медии; Курсове за обучение; Видео уроци; Уебинари; Други
vi: Kênh hỗ trợ khách hàng: Diễn đàn cộng đồng; Hỗ trợ qua email; Hỗ trợ trên diễn đàn; Hỗ trợ trong ứng dụng; Cơ sở kiến thức và Câu hỏi thường gặp; Hỗ trợ qua trò chuyện trực tiếp; Trợ lý cá nhân; Hỗ trợ qua điện thoại; Hỗ trợ trên mạng xã hội; Lớp đào tạo; Video hướng dẫn; Hội thảo trên mạng; Khác
pt-PT: Canais de assistência ao cliente: Fórum da comunidade; Assistência por e-mail; Assistência ao fórum; Assistência na aplicação; Base de conhecimento e FAQs; Assistência ao chat em tempo real; Agente pessoal; Assistência por telefone; Assistência nas redes sociais; Cursos de formação; Tutoriais em vídeo; Webinars; Outro
de: Kundensupportkanäle: Communityforum; E-Mail-Support; Forumsupport; In-App-Support; Wissensdatenbank und FAQs; Live-Chat-Support; Persönliche Kundenbetreuer; Telefonischer Support; Social-Media-Support; Schulungskurse; Videotutorials; Webinare; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Klientų palaikymo kanalai: Bendruomenės forumas; Pagalba el. paštu; Pagalba forume; Pagalba programoje; Žinių bazė ir DUK; Pagalba per pokalbio funkciją; Asmeninis atstovas; Pagalba telefonu; Pagalba socialiniuose tinkluose; Pamokos; Mokomieji vaizdo įrašai; Internetiniai seminarai; Kita
da: Kundesupportkanaler: Fællesskabsforum; E-mailsupport; Forumsupport; In-app-support; Vidensbase og ofte stillede spørgsmål; Livechat-support; Personlig medarbejder; Telefonsupport; Support på sociale medier; Træningsklasser; Videovejledninger; Webinarer; Andet
ja: カスタマーサポートチャネル: コミュニティフォーラム; メールサポート; フォーラムサポート; アプリ内サポート; ナレッジベースとよくある質問; ライブチャットサポート; 個人エージェント; 電話サポート; ソーシャルメディアサポート; トレーニングクラス; 動画チュートリアル; ウェビナー; その他
ro-RO: Canale de asistență pentru clienți: Forum comunitar; Asistență prin e-mail; Asistență pe forum; Asistență în aplicație; Baza de cunoștințe și întrebări frecvente; Asistență prin chat live; Agent personal; Asistență prin telefon; Asistență prin rețelele sociale; Cursuri de instruire; Tutoriale video; Webinarii; Altele
it: Canali di assistenza clienti: Forum della Community; Supporto via e-mail; Supporto via forum; Supporto nell'app; Knowledge base e domande frequenti; Supporto tramite live chat; Agente personale; Supporto telefonico; Supporto via social media; Corsi di formazione; Tutorial video; Webinar; Altro
fi: Asiakastukikanavat: Yhteisöfoorumi; Sähköpostituki; Foorumin tuki; Sovelluksen sisäinen tuki; Tietokanta ja usein kysytyt kysymykset; Live chat -tuki; Henkilökohtainen edustaja; Puhelintuki; Sosiaalisen median tuki; Koulutustunnit; Video-opetusohjelmat; Webinaarit; Muu
sl-SI: Kanali za podporo strankam: Forum skupnosti; Podpora po e-pošti; Forumska podpora; Podpora v aplikaciji; Baza znanja in pogosta vprašanja; Klepet v živo; Osebni agent; Telefonska podpora; Podpora družbenih medijev; Tečaji usposabljanja; Video vadnice; Spletni seminarji; Drugo